Utah statutes.
48-2c-209.   Correcting filed documents.
(1)  A domestic or foreign company may correct a document filed with the
division if the document:
(a)  contains an incorrect statement, misspelling, or other technical error or
defect; or
(b)  was defectively signed, attested, sealed, verified, or acknowledged.
(2)  A document is corrected by delivering to the division for filing articles
of correction that:
(a)  describe the document, including its filing date, or have a copy of it
attached to the articles of correction;
(b)  specify the incorrect statement and the reason it is incorrect or the
manner in which the signing, attestation, sealing, verification, or
acknowledgment was defective; and
(c)  correct the incorrect statement, misspelling, or other technical error or
defect, or defective signing, attestation, sealing, verification, or
acknowledgment.
(3)  Articles of correction may be signed by any person designated in Section
48-2c-204, or by any person who signed the document that is corrected.
(4)  Articles of correction are effective on the effective date of the
document they correct except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document
and adversely affected by the correction.  As to those persons, articles of
correction are effective when filed with the division.
